Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2409.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 28-9.4-1, 28-9.4-3, 28-9.4-4, 28-9.4-12 and 28-9.4-13 of the General
Laws in Chapter 28-9.4 entitled "Municipal Employees’ Arbitration" are hereby amended to read
as follows:
28-9.4-1. Declaration of policy — Purpose.
(a) It is declared to be the public policy of this state to accord to municipal employees the
right to organize, to be represented, to negotiate, and to bargain on a collective basis with municipal
employers, covering over hours, salary, working conditions wages, rates of pay and all other terms
of employment; provided, that nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to accord to
municipal employees the right to strike.
(b) To provide for the exercise of these rights, a method of arbitration of disputes is hereby
established. The establishment of this method of arbitration shall be deemed to be a recognition
solely of the necessity to provide some alternative mode of settling disputes where employees must,
as a matter of public policy, be denied the usual right to strike.
28-9.4-3. Right to organize and bargain collectively.
(a) The municipal employees of any municipal employer in any city, town, or regional
school district shall have the right to negotiate and to bargain collectively with their respective
municipal employers and to be represented by an employee organization in the negotiation or
collective bargaining concerning hours, salary, working conditions wages, rates of pay, and all

other terms and conditions of employment.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), for those municipal employees who
are employed by school districts, collective bargaining agreements shall not provide for benefits
for health care (“benefit plans”) for school district employees unless such benefit plans are
authorized in accordance with chapter 73 of title 27. School district employees whose collective
bargaining agreements expire on or after September 30, 2011, may, upon expiration of such
collective bargaining agreements, receive benefit plans including, but not limited to, those
recommended in accordance with chapter 73 of title 27.
28-9.4-4. Recognition of bargaining agent.
The employee organization selected by the municipal employees in an appropriate
bargaining unit, as determined by the state labor relations board, shall be recognized by the
municipal employer or the city, town, or district as the sole and exclusive negotiating or bargaining
agent for all of the municipal employees in the appropriate bargaining unit in the city, town, or
school district unless and until recognition of the employee organization is withdrawn or changed
by vote of the municipal employees in the appropriate bargaining unit after a duly conducted
election held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. An employee organization or the municipal
employer may designate any person or persons to negotiate or bargain in its behalf; provided,
however, that the person or persons so designated shall be given the authority to enter into and
conclude an effective and binding collective bargaining agreement.
28-9.4-12. Hearings.
(a) The arbitrators shall call a hearing to be held within ten (10) days after their appointment
and shall give at least seven (7) days’ notice, in writing, to the negotiating or bargaining agent and
the municipal employer of the time and place of the hearing.
(b) The hearing shall be informal, and the rules of evidence prevailing in judicial
proceedings shall not be binding. Any and all documentary evidence and other data deemed
relevant by the arbitrators may be received in evidence.
(c) The arbitrators shall have the power to administer oaths and to require by subpoena the
attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the production of books, records, and other evidence
relative or pertinent to the issues presented to them for determination.
(d) Both the negotiating or bargaining agent and the municipal employer shall have the
right to be represented at any hearing before the arbitrators by counsel of their own choosing.
(e) The hearing conducted by the arbitrators shall be concluded within twenty (20) days of
the time of commencement, and within ten (10) days after the conclusion of the hearings, the
arbitrators shall make written findings and a written opinion upon the issues presented, a copy of
LC004253 - Page 2 of 5

which shall be mailed or otherwise delivered to the negotiating or bargaining agent or its attorney
or other designated representative and the municipal employer. A majority decision of the
arbitrators shall be final and binding upon both the bargaining agent and the municipal employer.
28-9.4-13. Appeal from decision.
(a) While the parties are engaged in negotiations and/or utilizing the dispute resolution
process as required in § 28-9.4-10, all terms and conditions in the collective bargaining agreement
shall remain in effect. The decision of the arbitrators shall be made public and shall be binding
upon the municipal employees in the appropriate bargaining unit and their representative and the
municipal employer on all matters not involving the expenditure of money. Should either party
reject the nonbinding matters in the decision of the arbitrators, the binding matters shall be
implemented. Following the conclusion of the dispute resolution process as required in § 28-9.4-
10, should the parties still be unable to reach agreement, all contractual provisions related to wages
and benefits contained in the collective bargaining agreement, except for any contractual provisions
that limit layoffs, shall continue as agreed to in the expired collective bargaining agreement until
such time as a successor agreement has been reached between the parties.
(b) The decision of the arbitrators shall be final and cannot be appealed except on the
ground that the decision was procured by fraud or that it violates the law, in which case appeals
shall be to the superior court.
(c) The municipal employer shall within three (3) days after it receives the decision send a
true copy of the decision by certified or registered mail postage prepaid to the department or agency
of the municipal employer responsible for the preparation of the budget and to the agency of the
municipal employer that appropriates money for the operation of the particular municipal function
or service in the city, town, or regional school district involved, if the decision involves the
expenditure of money.
SECTION 2. Chapter 28-9.4 of the General Laws entitled "Municipal Employees’
Arbitration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-9.4-12.1. Factors to be considered by arbitration board.
The arbitrators shall conduct the hearings and render their decision upon the basis of a
prompt, peaceful and just settlement of wages, rates of pay, hours or terms and conditions of
employment disputes, between the municipal employees and their municipal employer. The factors,
among others, to be given weight by the arbitrators in arriving at a decision shall include:
(1) Comparison of wage rates or hourly conditions of employment of a municipal employer
in question, with prevailing wage rates or hourly conditions of employment for the same or similar
work of employees exhibiting like or similar skills, under the same or similar working conditions
LC004253 - Page 3 of 5

in the local operating area involved;
(2) Comparison of wage rates or hourly conditions of employment of the municipal
employer in question with wage rates or hourly conditions of employment maintained for the same
or similar work of employees exhibiting like or similar skills under the same or similar working
conditions in the local operating area involved;
(3) Comparison of wage rates or hourly conditions of employment of the municipal
employer in question with wage rates or hourly conditions of employment of municipal employers
in cities or towns of comparable size;
(4) Interest and welfare of the public; and
(5) Comparison of peculiarities of employment with other trades or professions,
specifically:
(i) Hazards of employment;
(ii) Physical qualifications;
(iii) Educational qualifications;
(iv) Mental qualifications; and
(v) Job training and skills.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004253
========
LC004253 - Page 4 of 5